Alaska, session 34, SB13.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 03 * Section 1. AS 44.27.020 is amended to read: 04 Sec. 44.27.020. Duties of department. The Department of Education and 05 Early Development shall 06 (1) administer the state's program of education at the elementary, 07 secondary, and adult levels, including, but not limited to, programs of vocational 08 education and training, library services, and correspondence courses, but not including 09 degree programs of postsecondary education; 10 (2) administer the historical library; [AND] 11 (3) plan, finance, and operate related school and educational activities 12 and facilities; 13 (4) take all necessary actions to qualify for available federal funds 14 for the summer electronic benefits transfer program and administer the summer 15 electronic benefits transfer program; and 01 (5) adopt regulations necessary to carry out the summer electronic 02 benefits transfer program [REPEALED]. 03 * Sec. 2. AS 44.27.020 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 04 (b) In this section, "summer electronic benefits transfer program" means the 05 federal summer electronic benefits transfer program for children authorized by 42 06 U.S.C. 1762. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.